Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB347.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Subsurface Oil and Gas Lease Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Company." An entity doing business within this Commonwealth and subject to tax under Article III, IV or VI of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.123456789101112131415161718 "Department." The Department of Conservation and Natural Resources of the Commonwealth."Secretary." The Secretary of Conservation and Natural Resources of the Commonwealth."Upfront payments." All payments received by the Commonwealth which are paid at the time that a lease is entered into under this act.Section 3. Subsurface drilling under Commonwealth lands.(a) Program established.--The department shall establish a program to review submissions or nominations by companies for the leasing of subsurface rights under State forest and park property for oil and gas development from subsurface drilling originating from well sites outside State forest or park property.(b) Lease approval.--The secretary may approve or disapprove a submission or nomination for a lease under this act. The department shall provide in writing to a company which has sent a submission or nomination to the department notice of the department's decision to approve or disapprove a lease within 60 days of receipt from the company. The department shall list all reasons for disapproval in the notification.(c) Resubmission upon disapproval.--A company receiving notice of disapproval may resend a submission or nomination to the department with or without changes and may include a response addressing the department's reasons within 60 calendar days of receipt of the department's disapproval. The department shall provide in writing to a company which has sent a resubmission to the department notice of the department's decision to approve or disapprove a submission or nomination within 60 days of receipt from the company. The department shall 20250HB0347PN0302 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 list all reasons for disapproval in the notification.(d) Reasons for disapproval.--The department may disapprove a submission or nomination for the following reasons:(1) The company has environmental compliance violations within this Commonwealth which have not been satisfactorily addressed and which have caused a significant negative environmental impact.(2) Development of the tract would lead to the need for related infrastructure development elsewhere on State forest land which would, in the department's determination, lead to significant negative environmental impacts.(e) Appeal.--A company receiving notice of disapproval of a resubmission under subsection (c) may appeal the disapproval to Commonwealth Court. Commonwealth Court shall consider the factors in subsection (d) when considering an appeal.(f) Implementation and posting.--Within 90 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall implement the program under subsection (a) and post information relating to the program and instructions regarding the manner in which submissions or nominations should be sent for review on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(g) Submissions and nominations.--Companies may begin sending submissions or nominations for review under this act to the department 90 days after the effective date of this subsection.(h) Competitive bidding process.--If the department approves a submission or nomination under this act, the department shall hold a competitive bidding process for the rights in question under the already-approved submission or nomination as follows:(1) The department shall notify the company that 20250HB0347PN0302 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submitted the approved submission or nomination of the time and manner by which the bidding process will take place. The bidding process shall be open to any company.(2) When the department approves a submission or nomination under this act, the department shall post information regarding the time and manner by which the bidding process will take place, along with a description of the rights which will be bid.(3) The department shall complete the bidding process and select the winning bidder within 45 days of approving a submission or nomination under this act.(4) The winning bidder shall be awarded a lease for the rights in question previously approved by the department.Section 4. Deposit of lease revenue and grant program.(a) Oil and Gas Lease Fund.--All revenue generated from leases under this act shall be deposited into the Oil and Gas Lease Fund.(b) Restricted account and continuing appropriation.--Money deposited into the Oil and Gas Lease Fund under subsection (a) that is attributable to upfront payments made in consideration for a lease under this act shall be transferred to a restricted account within the fund. The money of the restricted account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the department for the grant program under subsection (c).(c) Grant program.--(1) The department shall establish a grant program under this act to fund stream maintenance and clearing projects. The department shall prioritize awarding the money under the grant program to all of the following:(i) Projects designed to mitigate the risk of 20250HB0347PN0302 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 flooding.(ii) Projects that have the potential to preserve farmland or residential property from flooding.(iii) Projects from areas of this Commonwealth that have been under Federal or State disaster emergency related to flooding within the last five years.(2) The department shall award, in consultation with county conservation districts, the money under the grant program to projects in different areas of this Commonwealth. A proposed project within a single county or municipality shall not receive more than 10% of the money under the grant program distributed by the department in a given year.Section 5. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to prohibit oil and gas drilling on State forest and park property in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth.Section 6. Abrogation of executive order and other orders and administrative policies.This act shall abrogate Executive Order 2015-03 and any other order or administrative policy in conflict with this act.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0347PN0302 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122